Illinois, session 104th, HB4417.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Sections 601.1 and 605 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/601.1)  (Ch. 120, par. 6-601.1)7    Sec. 601.1. Payment by electronic funds transfer. 8    (a) Beginning on October 1, 1993, a taxpayer who has an 9average monthly tax liability of $150,000 or more under 10Article 7 of this Act shall make all payments required by rules 11of the Department by electronic funds transfer. Beginning 12October 1, 1993, a taxpayer who has an average quarterly 13estimated tax payment obligation of $450,000 or more under 14Article 8 of this Act shall make all payments required by rules 15of the Department by electronic funds transfer. Beginning on 16October 1, 1994, a taxpayer who has an average monthly tax 17liability of $100,000 or more under Article 7 of this Act shall 18make all payments required by rules of the Department by 19electronic funds transfer. Beginning October 1, 1994, a 20taxpayer who has an average quarterly estimated tax payment 21obligation of $300,000 or more under Article 8 of this Act 22shall make all payments required by rules of the Department by 23electronic funds transfer. Beginning on October 1, 1995, a   HB4417- 2 -LRB104 17610 HLH 31040 b1taxpayer who has an average monthly tax liability of $50,000 2or more under Article 7 of this Act shall make all payments 3required by rules of the Department by electronic funds 4transfer. Beginning October 1, 1995, a taxpayer who has an 5average quarterly estimated tax payment obligation of $150,000 6or more under Article 8 of this Act shall make all payments 7required by rules of the Department by electronic funds 8transfer. Beginning on October 1, 2000, and for all liability 9periods thereafter, a taxpayer who has an average annual tax 10liability of $200,000 or more under Article 7 of this Act shall 11make all payments required by rules of the Department by 12electronic funds transfer. Beginning October 1, 2000, a 13taxpayer who has an average quarterly estimated tax payment 14obligation of $50,000 or more under Article 8 of this Act shall 15make all payments required by rules of the Department by 16electronic funds transfer. Beginning on October 1, 2002, a 17taxpayer who has a tax liability in the amount set forth in 18subsection (b) of Section 2505-210 of the Department of 19Revenue Law shall make all payments required by rules of the 20Department by electronic funds transfer. Beginning on October 211, 2002, a taxpayer who has a tax liability in the amount set 22forth in subsection (b) of Section 2505-210 of the Department 23of Revenue Law shall make all payments required by rules of the 24Department by electronic funds transfer.25    (b) Any taxpayer who is not required to make payments by 26electronic funds transfer may make payments by electronic   HB4417- 3 -LRB104 17610 HLH 31040 b1funds transfer with the permission of the Department.2    (c) All taxpayers required to make payments by electronic 3funds transfer and any taxpayers who wish to voluntarily make 4payments by electronic funds transfer shall make those 5payments in the manner authorized by the Department.6    (d) The Department shall notify all taxpayers required to 7make payments by electronic funds transfer. All taxpayers 8notified by the Department shall make payments by electronic 9funds transfer for a minimum of one year beginning on October 101. In determining the threshold amounts under subsection (a), 11the Department shall calculate the averages as follows: 12        (1) the total liability under Article 7 for the 13    preceding tax year (and, prior to October 1, 2000, divided 14    by 12); or 15        (2) for purposes of estimated payments under Article 16    8, the total tax obligation of the taxpayer for the 17    previous tax year divided by 4.18    (e) The Department shall adopt such rules as are necessary 19to effectuate a program of electronic funds transfer and the 20requirements of this Section.21    (f) The Department may not impose fees or charges for the 22payment by electronic funds transfer of taxes under this Act, 23including, but not limited to, fees or charges for the 24recovery of any convenience fee imposed by a credit card 25issuer. 26(Source: P.A. 91-541, eff. 8-13-99; 92-492, eff. 1-1-02;   HB4417- 4 -LRB104 17610 HLH 31040 b192-846, eff. 8-23-02.) 2    (35 ILCS 5/605)  (from Ch. 120, par. 6-605)3    Sec. 605. The Department shall may adopt rules and 4regulations for payment of taxes due under this Act by credit 5card only when the Department is not required to pay a discount 6fee charged by the credit card issuer.7(Source: P.A. 87-1175; 87-1189.) 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.